Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.902

Effective dates, implementation—1991 c 208.

(1) Sections 1 through 23 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1992, but the director shall take such steps and adopt such rules as are necessary to implement this act by that date.

(2) Section 24 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1993.

[ 1994 c 92 s 174; 1991 c 208 s 25.]